Illinois, session 104th, HB1875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 11-1511.5 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-1511.5 new)7    Sec. 11-1511.5. Operation of bicycle approaching a stop 8sign. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "immediate hazard" means a 10vehicle approaching an intersection at a proximity and rate of 11speed sufficient to indicate to a reasonable person that there 12is a danger of collision or accident.13    (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), an individual 14operating a bicycle approaching a stop sign may proceed 15through the intersection without stopping at the stop sign if:16        (1) the individual slows to a reasonable speed; and17        (2) the individual yields the right-of-way to:18            (i) any pedestrian within the intersection or an 19        adjacent crosswalk;20            (ii) other traffic within the intersection; and21            (iii) oncoming traffic that poses an immediate 22        hazard during the time the individual is traveling 23        through the intersection.  HB1875- 2 -LRB104 09250 LNS 19308 b1    (c) Subsection (b) does not apply to an intersection with 2an active railroad grade crossing.